Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 39 Governmental Claims
§ 1-39-104.
Granting immunity from tort liability; liability on contracts; exceptions.

A governmental entity and its public employees while acting within the scope of duties are granted immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by W.S.

1-39-105

through

1-39-112

. Any immunity in actions based on a contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived except to the extent provided by the contract if the contract was within the powers granted to the entity and was properly executed and except as provided in W.S. 1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S.

1-39-113

apply to contractual claims against governmental entities.

When liability is alleged against any public employee, if the governmental entity determines he was acting within the scope of his duty, whether or not alleged to have been committed maliciously or fraudulently, the governmental entity shall provide a defense at its expense.

A governmental entity shall assume and pay a judgment entered under this act against any of its public employees, provided:

The act or omission upon which the claim is based has been determined by a court or jury to be within the public employee’s scope of duties;

The payment for the judgment shall not exceed the limits provided by W.S.

1-39-118

; and

All appropriate appeals from the judgment have been exhausted or the time has expired when appeals may be taken.

A governmental entity shall assume and pay settlements of claims under this act against its public employees in accordance with W.S.

1-39-115

,

1-41-106

or

1-42-204

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1980, ch. 46, § 1; 1986, ch. 19, § 1; 1988, ch. 45, § 1; 1999, ch. 157, § 2; 2007, ch. 212, § 1; 2016 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “1-42-204” for “1-42-107” in subsection (d).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added “1-39-120(b) and” preceding “1-39-121” in (a).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), added “and limited by
W.S.

1-39-121

” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted “and

1-39-121

” following “1-39-120(b).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 1, § 2 state as follows: “This act shall apply to seizures of property which occur on or after July 1, 2016 and to any forfeitures proceedings related to property seized on or after July 1, 2016.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 212, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Contract exception did not apply.—

Client’s legal malpractice suit against public defenders alleged a general breach of the duty owed by an attorney to a client, not that they violated a specific contract term unrelated to the attorney-client relationship; therefore, the client’s suit was in tort and his attempt to categorize it as a breach of contract subject to the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act’s waiver of sovereign immunity for contract claims failed. Dockter v. Lozano, 2020 WY 119, 472 P.3d 362,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2020).

No respondeat superior actions. —

A governmental entity cannot be held liable under 42 USCS § 1983 on a respondeat superior theory. Kimbley v. Green River, 663 P.2d 871,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1983).

Sovereign immunity bars claims. —

The Mississippi court erroneously concluded that plaintiff's complaint for the torts of bad faith and infliction of emotional distress was not barred under Wyoming's law of sovereign immunity. Routh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 952 P.2d 1108,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. Feb. 17, 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 814, 119 S. Ct. 49, 142 L. Ed. 2d 38, 1998 U.S. LEXIS 4815 (U.S. 1998).

Applicability of §

1-39-112

. —

Without a determination that the officers were not acting within the scope of their duties or that their conduct was not tortious, the governmental entity does not escape liability for the tortious acts of its peace officers. Darrar v. Bourke, 910 P.2d 572,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1996).

In suit by
former student alleging he was wrongfully terminated from pharmacy
program, claims of intentional infliction of emotional distress and
negligent infliction of emotional distress were barred by Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act Jemaneh v. Univ. of Wyo., 82 F. Supp. 3d 1281, 2015 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 29789 (D. Colo.), aff'd, 622 Fed. Appx. 765, 2015 U.S. App. LEXIS 20507 (10th Cir. Colo. 2015).

Social workers granted immunity. —

Social case workers are not “health care providers” within the meaning of §§

1-39-110

and

1-12-601

. They are, therefore, granted immunity by this chapter. May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993).

City not negligent in requiring iron pipe. —

The court properly granted summary judgment for a city, where the plaintiff's claim asserted that the city council was negligent in adopting an ordinance which required the use of an iron pipe in a water system, which proved over time to be unsatisfactory or perhaps even ill-considered. The claim did not fit the niche provided by § 1-39-108(a), nor was it one which fell within the statutory exceptions to the general immunity provided for in this section. Sawyer v. Sheridan, 793 P.2d 476,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1990).

County commissioners immune from suit. —

County commissioners were acting well within the scope of their duties at all relevant times in allocating the budget and determining compensation for the county coroner's office, and were accordingly immune from suit in a former county coroner's tortious action for interference with official duties and discrimination. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

State Loan and Investment Board immune from suit. —

The Wyoming Farm Loan Board (now state loan and investment board) is a governmental entity for purposes of the immunity under §

1-39-104

.Haldeman v. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd., 32 F.3d 469,

1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 21130

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1994).

County clerk and budget officer immune from tort suit. —

A county clerk and budget officer was acting well within the scope of her duties in preparing budgets during the time a former county coroner alleged she committed tortious conduct and was accordingly immune from suit. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

State transportation commission immune. —

The Wyoming Governmental Claims Act repealed by implication an earlier statute authorizing suit against the state transportation commission, and therefore the commission was authorized to insert a sovereign immunity provision in its contract with paving contractor. Emulsified Asphalt v. Transportation Comm'n, 970 P.2d 858,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1998).

Failure to treat bid fairly. —

Unsuccessful bidder's challenge of an award to sell dump truck chassis and tractors to an out-of-state bidder based on the theory's failure to treat its bid fairly and for loss of profit and costs of submitting its bid sounded in tort and was precluded by the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. Lariat Diesel Corp. v. Wyo. DOT, 2004 WY 25, 86 P.3d 266,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2004).

Highway patrolman allegedly negligent in not sanding icy road
not immune from suit. —

A highway patrolman, who was allegedly negligent in not having an icy road sanded after being called to the scene of an accident, was not immune from suit under subsection (a) of this section, even though §

1-39-112

, which creates an exception to governmental immunity, refers only to a “governmental entity.” His immunity was purely dependent upon the immunity of the state. His protection was found not in immunity, but in the duty of the state under subsection (b) of this section to provide him a defense and to indemnify him. State v. Dieringer, 708 P.2d 1,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 578

(Wyo. 1985).

State penitentiary training officer. —

A training officer acting within the scope of his employment at a state penitentiary enjoys immunity from suit under this act. Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994).

No liability for harboring vicious animal. —

The waiver of governmental immunity incorporated in §

1-39-104

does not permit a claim of common-law liability for harboring an animal known to be vicious to be asserted against a city or town. Such a claim sounds in strict liability and claims for strict liability are not included in the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. Abelseth v. City of Gillette, 752 P.2d 430,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1988).

Injured governmental employee covered by worker's compensation
precluded from suing government in tort. —

It is only in those situations where an injured governmental employee-plaintiff is covered by worker's compensation that the exclusive-remedy provisions of the worker's compensation laws preclude a direct action in tort against the employer-governmental entity. The Worker's Compensation Act and the waiver-of-immunity provisions of the Governmental Claims Act do, however, permit the injured governmental employee to structure a claim against his or her co-employee, provided the claimant can prove culpable negligence. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Negligent state employee may sue for indemnification, even
though receiving worker's compensation benefits. —

The worker's compensation exclusive-remedy constitutional and statutory provisions did not deny standing to a state employee, held liable for his culpably negligent acts while acting within the scope of his employment, to bring suit against the state under this section for indemnification, even though the employee was receiving benefits from the worker's compensation fund. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

But estate of coemployee, killed by negligence, not third-party
beneficiary to indemnity agreement. —

Even though the sovereign immunity of the state and one of its employees had been waived by §

1-39-105

, the estate of a coemployee, killed in an automobile mishap in the scope of his employment by reason of the culpable negligence of the state employee, did not possess standing to sue the state as a third-party beneficiary to the indemnity agreement between the state and the negligent employee. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Omitted affirmative defense raised by summary-judgment motion.
—

The board of county commissioners could raise an omitted affirmative defense of governmental immunity for the first time by a motion for summary judgment, where no prejudice to the adverse party was alleged. Pickle v. Board of County Comm'rs, 764 P.2d 262,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1988).

The Wyoming Underground Facilities Notification Act,

§

37-12-301

et seq., does not contain an express waiver of government immunity. Diamond Surface v. Cleveland, 963 P.2d 996,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1998).

Public duty rule. —

Public duty only rule, if it ever was recognized in Wyoming, is no longer viable. Natrona County v. Blake, 2003 WY 170, 81 P.3d 948,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2003).

Contract exception did not apply.—

District court properly granted a school district’s motion to dismiss a special needs student’s personal injury claim based on governmental immunity where the school was obligated by the IDEA to implement the student’s IEP at no cost to the grandparents, thus, the IEP was not a contract and did not create an exception to the schools governmental immunity. SH v. Campbell Cty. Sch. Dist., 2018 WY 11, 409 P.3d 1231,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2018).

Applicability. —

Because parents and a student specifically alleged that school district employees acted within their scope of duties, the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act applied to the employees’ actions as alleged in the complaint; the complaint stated the acts were attributed to the school district, and generally alleged the employees were acting within the scope of their employment or agency; Whitham v. Feller, 2018 WY 43, 415 P.3d 1264,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2018).

Interlocutory review. —

Interlocutory review of a denial of summary judgment based on a claim of governmental immunity is limited to the purely legal issue of whether the State is immune from suit under the Wyoming Government Claims Act; the clear language of the Claims Act establishes the legislature intended “immunity from liability” to mean immunity from suit, not a defense to liability. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Because immunity under the Wyoming Government Claims Act is an immunity from suit and not merely a defense to liability, it, like qualified immunity, is effectively lost if the case is erroneously permitted to go to trial; therefore, a denial of summary judgment based on a claim of governmental immunity is appealable without the need for a writ of review. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Interlocutory review of denials of summary judgment based on governmental immunity is limited to the purely legal issue of whether the State is immune from suit under the Government Claims Act; the supreme court may review whether the legislature waived the State’s sovereign immunity under the Act, i.e., whether the plaintiff’s claims fall within a statutory exceptions to sovereign immunity, but denials of summary judgment based on issues pertaining to the State’s liability are not appealable. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Exceptions to immunity.—

Supreme court rejected parents’ request to recognize an exception to immunity for violation of school policy and/or criminal conduct because it was not the supreme court’s prerogative to expand the exceptions to immunity beyond that provided by the legislature in the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. Whitham v. Feller, 2018 WY 43, 415 P.3d 1264,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2018).

Sheriff's liability. —

Neither the sheriff nor the county was liable for the tortious conduct of the deputy because that conduct did not occur within the deputy's scope of duties, and neither the sheriff nor the county was liable for the conduct of the sheriff, even though within the scope of his duties, because his conduct was not tortious.
Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Hurst v. State, 698 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1985); Davis v. City of Casper, 710 P.2d 827,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1985); Matthews v. Wyoming Dep't of Agriculture, 719 P.2d 216,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 554

(Wyo. 1986); State Ex Rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Feb. 24, 2009).

Quoted

in

De Wald v. State, 719 P.2d 643,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 561

(Wyo. 1986); Sykes v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist., 763 P.2d 1263,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1988); Harbel v. Wintermute, 883 P.2d 359,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1994); Newberry v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 919 P.2d 141,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1996); Hall v. Park County, 2010 WY 124, 238 P.3d 580,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 3, 2010); Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 2014 WL 46689 (Jan 7, 2014); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

State v. Stovall, 648 P.2d 543,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1982); Corbitt v. Andersen, 778 F.2d 1471,

1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 25531

(10th Cir. 1985); Boehm v. Cody Country Chamber of Commerce, 748 P.2d 704,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 569

(Wyo. 1987); Cline v. State, Dep't of Family Servs., 927 P.2d 261,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1996); Eathorne v. Bd. of Trustees, 2001 WY 36,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 47

, 21 P.3d 745 (Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Bell, 662 P.2d 410,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1983); St. Paul Fire & Marine Ins. Co. v. Albany County Sch. Dist., 763 P.2d 1255,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1988); Cranston v. Weston County Weed & Pest Bd., 826 P.2d 251,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1992); Keehn ex rel. Keehn v. Town of Torrington, 834 P.2d 112,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1992); Scott v. School Dist. No. 6, 815 F. Supp. 424, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2899 (D. Wyo. 1993); Allen v. Lucero, 925 P.2d 228,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1996); Peterson v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. One, 929 P.2d 525,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1996); Romero v. Schulze, 974 P.2d 959,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1999); Bachmeier v. Hoffman, 1 P.3d 1236,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2000); Natrona County v. Blake, 2003 WY 170, 81 P.3d 948,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2003); McMackin v. Johnson County Healthcare Ctr., 2004 WY 44, 88 P.3d 491,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For article, “Who's Really Who? Apportioning Liability of Independent Contractors Who Work for Hospitals that Qualify for Sovereign Immunity in a Rural State”, see 15 Wyo. L. Rev. 211 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental tort liability for social service agency's negligence in placement, or supervision after placement, of children, 90 ALR3d 1214.

Governmental liability from operation of zoo, 92 ALR3d 832.

Liability of governmental unit for injuries or damage resulting from tree or limb falling onto highway from abutting land, 95 ALR3d 778.

Immunity of public officer from liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 5 ALR4th 773.

Governmental tort liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 6 ALR4th 1155.

Liability of governmental officer or entity for failure to warn or notify of release of potentially dangerous individual from custody, 12 ALR4th 722.

Liability of governmental unit for intentional assault by employee other than police officer, 17 ALR4th 881.

Liability of governmental unit for injuries caused by driver of third vehicle to person whose vehicle had been stopped by police car, 17 ALR4th 897.

State lotteries: actions by ticketholders against state or contractor for state, 40 ALR4th 662.

Amount of appropriation as limitation on damages for breach of contract recoverable by one contracting with government agency, 40 ALR4th 998.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance limiting the kinds or amount of actual damages recoverable in tort action against governmental unit, 43 ALR4th 19.

Liability of school authorities for hiring or retaining incompetent or otherwise unsuitable teacher, 60 ALR4th 260.

Tort liability of public authorities for failure to remove parentally abused or neglected children from parents' custody, 60 ALR4th 942.

Legal aspects of speed bumps, 60 ALR4th 1249.

Reviewability before trial of order denying qualified immunity to defendant sued in state court under 42 USCS § 1983, 49 ALR5th 717.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection from crime, 90 ALR5th 273.

Tort liability of United States under claims act for acts committed by aliens, 78 ALR Fed 683.

Construction and application of Westfall Act provision providing
federal employee immunity from ordinary tort suits if attorney general
certifies that employee was acting within scope of office or employment
at time of incident out of which claim arose (28 USCS § 2679(d)),
120 ALR Fed 95.

Claims arising from governmental conduct causing damage to plaintiff's
real property as within discretionary function exception of federal
tort claims act (28 U.S.C. § 2680(a)),
167 ALR Fed 1.

Liability of United States for failure to warn of danger or hazard not directly created by act or omission of federal government and not in national parks as affected by “discretionary function or duty” exception to Federal Tort Claims Act, 169 ALR Fed 421.

Liability of United States for failure to warn of danger or hazard
resulting from governmental act or omission as affected by “discretionary
function or duty” exception to Federal Tort Claims Act (28 U.S.C. § 2680(a)),
170 ALR Fed 365.

Liability of United States for failure to warn local police or individuals of discharge, release, or escape of person who is deemed dangerous to public as affected by “discretionary act or duty” exception to Federal Tort Claims Act, 171 ALR Fed 655.

Claims arising from conduct of governmental employer in administering
or failing to administer medical care as within discretionary function
exception of Federal Tort Claims Act (28 U.S.C. § 2680(a)),
172 ALR Fed 407.

Liability of United States, under Federal Tort Claims Act (28 U.S.C. §§ 1346 , 2680), for damages caused by ingestion or administration of
government-approved drugs, vaccines, and medications,
173 ALR Fed 431.

Construction and application of Federal Tort Claims Act (FTCA) exception in 28 U.S.C. § 3680(c), concerning claims arising in respect of assessment or collection of any tax or customs duty, or detention of goods or merchandise by any officer of customs or excise or any other law-enforcement officer, 173 ALR Fed 465.

§ 1-39-105.
Liability; operation of motor vehicles, aircraft and watercraft.

A governmental entity
is liable for damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death
or property damage caused by the negligence of public employees while
acting within the scope of their duties in the operation of any motor
vehicle, aircraft or watercraft.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Police officers are not immune from liability if they negligently drive patrol car.

De Wald v. State, 719 P.2d 643,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 561

(Wyo. 1986).

There is no bar to liability

for operation of a motor vehicle, even if the motor vehicle is engaged in plowing snow on a roadway. Romero v. Hoppal, 855 P.2d 366,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1993).

Claim otherwise barred by sovereign immunity may be raised
as counterclaim. —

A claim which would otherwise be barred by the doctrine of sovereign immunity may be asserted as a counterclaim in a government-initiated lawsuit if it arises out of the transaction or occurrence that is the subject matter of the opposing party's claim and is asserted to reduce or defeat the government's claim. Ruppenthal v. State, 849 P.2d 1316,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1993).

Liability of supervisor. —

Where employee was the person directing and controlling loader as a driver for the purpose of propelling it as a motor vehicle when he was injured, the “operation” of the loader could not be imputed to defendants as a part of their responsibilities as supervisor and mechanic; there is persuasive authority against imputing “operation” to a supervisor or others not in actual physical control of the motor vehicle. Harbel v. Wintermute, 883 P.2d 359,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1994).

School district was immune from claims of negligent design of a bus route, negligent training and supervision of bus drivers, and negligent entrustment of vehicles to bus drivers, which allegedly contributed to the death of a student bus passenger, since the exception to immunity applicable to operation of a motor vehicle did not apply to district supervisors who did not physically operate the bus. Sperry v. Fremont County Sch. Dist. No. 6, 84 F. Supp. 3d 1277, 2015 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13910 (D. Wyo. 2015).

Liability not found. —

State was not liable for deaths of two minors killed when an automobile being driven by an employee of a state-certified residential treatment facility collided with an oncoming vehicle; the facility was in control of its day-to-day operations and thus an independent contractor outside the scope of the Governmental Claims Act, §

1-39-101

et seq. Cline v. Department of Family Servs., 927 P.2d 261,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1996).

Interlocutory review of denials of summary judgment based on government immunity. —

Interlocutory review of denials of summary judgment based on governmental immunity is limited to the purely legal issue of whether the State is immune from suit under the Government Claims Act; the supreme court may review whether the legislature waived the State’s sovereign immunity under the Act, i.e., whether the plaintiff’s claims fall within a statutory exceptions to sovereign immunity, but denials of summary judgment based on issues pertaining to the State’s liability are not appealable. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Applied

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo. 1985); Metz v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2007 WY 166, 173 P.3d 334,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Oct. 23, 2007).

Quoted

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993); May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993); Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 2014 WL 46689 (Jan 7, 2014); Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(July 31, 2015); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

“Motor vehicle” or the like within statute waiving governmental immunity as to operation of such vehicles, 77 ALR2d 945.

Liability of municipality as bailee for damage to airplane, 44 ALR3d 862.

Liability of governmental unit or its officers for injury to innocent occupant of moving vehicle, or for damage to such vehicle, as result of police chase, 4 ALR4th 865.

Municipal or state liability for injuries resulting from police roadblocks or commandeering of private vehicles, 19 ALR4th 937.

State's liability to one injured by improperly licensed driver, 41 ALR4th 111.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accident involving motor vehicle operated by student, 85 ALR5th 301.

§ 1-39-106.
Liability; buildings, recreation areas and public parks.

A governmental entity
is liable for damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death
or property damage caused by the negligence of public employees while
acting within the scope of their duties in the operation or maintenance
of any building, recreation area or public park.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Immunity not waived. —

Trial court
properly granted summary judgment in favor of a school district and
a teacher in a student's action to recover for injuries he sustained
during a science demonstration conducted in a school gymnasium because
the student's claims did not fall within the waiver of governmental
immunity for operation or maintenance of a building; the student presented
no evidence of a physical defect in the gymnasium. Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98, 353 P.3d 732,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2015).

Trial court
properly granted a school district and a teacher summary judgment
in a student's action to recover for injuries he sustained during
a science demonstration conducted in a school gymnasium because the
student's claims did not fall within the waiver of governmental immunity
for operation or maintenance of a recreation area; conducting and
supervising a science demonstration did not constitute operation or
maintenance of a recreation area simply because the activity took
place there. Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98, 353 P.3d 732,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2015).

Plaintiff’s negligence claim against the county fairgrounds did not fall within the waiver of immunity for negligent operation or maintenance of a building or recreation area because there was no evidence that the doors of the building were locked due to a physical defect in the doors or their locking mechanism; the failure of the doors to have a built-in propping mechanism was not a defect; and there was no evidence of how the brick or block came to be placed in the doorway on the evening of plaintiff’s injury, no evidence identifying the person who placed the object there and or the reason for doing so, and no testimony from anyone associated with the event concerning their experience with the doors that evening. Varela v. Goshen Cty. Fairgrounds, 2020 WY 124, 472 P.3d 1047,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2020).

Waiver of immunity limited. —

The waiver of immunity in this section is limited by §

1-39-120

.Newberry v. Board of County Comm'rs, 919 P.2d 141,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1996).

State was not immune from suit. —

Where plaintiff park patron alleged state employees were negligent in approving the design and construction of the fountain in steam room in a state park, defendant State of Wyoming was not immune from suit because its activities fell within the statutory waiver of immunity for operation and maintenance of a public park under this section.
Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2011).

Waiver of immunity. —

Waiver of immunity for parks includes the activities undertaken by the State within the park facilities.
Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2011).

Park defined. —

Plain meaning of “park”as used in this section is “a public area of land having facilities for recreation,” and “a piece of open land with public amenities.” The word “park” means more than the land itself; it includes whatever “amenities” and “facilities for recreation” the owner of the park chooses to incorporate.
Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2011).

State's operation of park. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

36-8-304

and this section clearly provide that overseeing building construction on leased property and delivery of hot mineral water to lessees are parts of the State's operation of Hot Springs State Park.
Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2011).

Building inspections not “maintenance.” —

Building inspections conducted by the department of fire prevention and electrical safety were not “maintenance,” as contemplated by this section. Soles v. State, 809 P.2d 772,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1991).

The deliberate destruction of a building

conducted during a municipal fire-training exercise is not “maintenance” for purposes of this section. City of Cheyenne v. Huitt, 844 P.2d 1102,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1993).

War memorial stadium at university of Wyoming is “recreation area,”

as contemplated by this section. Sports facilities are recreation areas. DiVenere v. University of Wyoming, 811 P.2d 273,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1991).

Operation defined. —

Term “operation” is not defined in this section; thus, the court uses the ordinary and obvious meaning of the term. “Operation” is defined as the “state of being operative or functional;” it is also defined as “the process of operating or mode of action.”
Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2011).

Trestle is a “bridge.” —

A trestle on the railroad right-of-way is a bridge for purposes of the application of §

1-39-120

.Newberry v. Board of County Comm'rs, 919 P.2d 141,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

State v. Stovall, 648 P.2d 543,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1982); Shisler v. Town of Jackson, 890 P.2d 555,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1995); Natrona County v. Blake, 2003 WY 170, 81 P.3d 948,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Landowner Liability Under the Wyoming Recreational Use Statute,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 649 (1980).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of municipality for injuries occasioned by falling of awning or the like, 34 ALR2d 486.

Municipal liability for injuries from freezing of water overflowing walk from adjoining building, 39 ALR2d 782.

Liability of municipality for injuries from fall or slipping on debris or litter on outdoor stairway, 47 ALR2d 1086.

Municipal operation of bathing beach or swimming pool as governmental or proprietary function, for purposes of tort liability, 55 ALR2d 1434.

Municipal liability for injury from slide or chute, 69 ALR2d 1067.

Liability of municipal corporation for injury or death on or near loop-o-plane, ferris wheel, miniature car or similar ride, 86 ALR2d 350.

Liability of municipality for injuries resulting from fall or slipping on defective outdoor stairway, 92 ALR2d 469.

Liability of governmental unit for injuries or damage resulting from tree or limb falling onto highway from abutting land, 95 ALR3d 778.

Liability of governmental entity to builder or developer for negligent issuance of building permit subsequently suspended or revoked, 41 ALR4th 99.

Baseball player's right to recover from baseball-related personal injuries from nonplayer, 55 ALR4th 664.

State's liability for personal injuries from criminal attack in state park, 59 ALR4th 1236.

Liability to one struck by golf club, 63 ALR4th 221.

Liability for injury incurred in operation of power golf cart, 66 ALR4th 622.

Liability of local government entity for injury resulting from use of outdoor playground equipment at municipally owned park or recreation area, 73 ALR4th 496.

Violation of governmental regulations as to conditions and facilities of swimming pools as affecting liability in negligence, 79 ALR4th 461.

Liability for injuries to, or death of, water-skiers, 34 ALR5th 77.

Liability of landlord for injury or death occasioned by swimming pool maintained for tenants, 62 ALR5th 475.

Products liability: swimming pools and accessories, 65 ALR5th 105.

Liability of owner, operator, or other parties, for personal injuries allegedly resulting from snow or ice on premises of parking lot, 74 ALR5th 49.

§ 1-39-107.
Liability; airports.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property damage caused by the negligence of public employees while acting within the scope of their duties in the operation of airports.

The liability imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section does not include liability for damages due to the existence of any condition arising out of compliance with any federal or state law or regulation governing the use and operation of airports.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Cited

in

May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993); Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(July 31, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For article, “Who's Really Who? Apportioning Liability of Independent Contractors Who Work for Hospitals that Qualify for Sovereign Immunity in a Rural State”, see 15 Wyo. L. Rev. 211 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of municipality for torts in connection with airport, 66 ALR2d 634.